District of Columbia statutes.
2-118

Effective date; publication and enforcement of regulations and fees.

This subchapter shall become effective 6 months from the date of their approval. The regulations and schedule of fees herein provided for shall be promulgated by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively, and printed in one or more of the daily newspapers published in the said District but shall not be enforced until 30 days after such publication or until December 25, 1936. Amendments to the regulations or new or additional schedules of fees, when and as the same may be adopted, shall likewise be printed in one or more of the daily newspapers published in the said District and no penalty for violation thereof or payment of new or additional fees prescribed shall be enforced until 30 days after such publication.

June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1919, ch. 802, § 17
1981 Ed., § 1-1018.
1973 Ed., § 1-718.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.